Virginia statutes. Title 29.1. Wildlife, Inland Fisheries and Boating.
Article 1. Hunting, Trapping and Fishing Licenses.

§ 29.1-300.
Unlawful to hunt, trap or fish without license.

It shall be unlawful to hunt, trap or fish in or on the lands or inland waters of this Commonwealth without first obtaining a license, subject to the exceptions set out in §

29.1-301

.

History.

Code 1950, § 29-51; 1987, c. 488.

Cross references.

For sections relating to license requirements for fishing in interjurisdictional inland waters, see §§

29.1-534

and

29.1-535

.

As to decisions rendered pursuant to provisions of Chapter 3, §

29.1-300

et seq., being exempt from the Administrative Process Act, see §

2.2-4002

.

As to offenses connected with hunting and fishing, see §§

18.2-131

through

18.2-136.1

.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

18 M.J. Trespass, § 1.

§ 29.1-300.1.
Certification of competence in hunter education; incentives.

Except as provided in subsection B and §§

29.1-300.4

and

29.1-305.2

, no hunting license shall be issued to (i) a person who has never obtained a license to hunt in any state or country, or (ii) a person who is under the age of 16, unless such a person presents to the Board or one of its authorized license vendors, a certificate of completion in hunter education issued or authorized by the Board under the hunter education program, or proof that he holds the equivalent certificate obtained from an authorized agency or association of another state or country.

Although a resident under the age of 12 is not required to obtain a license to hunt, any person under the age of 12, or an individual on his behalf, may purchase a Virginia hunting license or a junior lifetime hunting license pursuant to §

29.1-302.1

, without completing a hunter education program as required in subsection A, provided that no person under the age of 12 shall hunt unless accompanied and directly supervised by an adult who has, on his person, a valid Virginia hunting license. The junior lifetime hunting license issued to an individual under the age of 12 shall become invalid on the individual’s twelfth birthday and remain invalid until certification of competence in hunter education is shown as provided in this section. A lifetime license, indicating the completion of hunter education or an equivalent certificate, shall be reissued at no cost when such proof is provided.The adult shall be responsible for such supervision. For the purposes of this section, “adult” means the parent or legal guardian of the person under age 12, or such person over the age of 18 designated by the parent or legal guardian.“Accompanied and directly supervised” means that the adult is within sight of the person under the age of 12.

This section shall not apply to persons while on horseback hunting foxes with hounds but without firearms.

The Board may adopt regulations that provide incentives for successful completion of a hunter education course to hunters who are not required by law to complete such a course. The regulations may include such incentives as the Board deems appropriate.

History.

1987, c. 83, § 29-51.1; 1988, cc. 179, 384, 474; 1989, c. 204; 1996, cc. 118, 151; 1997, c. 247; 2008, cc. 18, 416; 2014, c. 798; 2016, c. 123; 2020, c. 958.

Editor’s note.

This section was enacted by Acts 1987, c. 83, as § 29-51.1. Pursuant to § 30-152, this section has been incorporated into Title 29.1 as §

29.1-300.1

.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 18 and 416 are identical, and inserted “and §

29.1-300.4

” in subsection A.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 798 in subsection A inserted “and

29.1-305.2

” and made a related change.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 123, in subsection A, deleted “of this section” following “subsection B” and substituted “16” for “sixteen”; in subsection B, substituted “12” for “twelve” wherever it appeared, deleted “of this section” following “subsection A” and substituted “18” for “eighteen”; and added subsection D.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 958 deleted “of Game and Inland Fisheries” following the first instance of “Board” in subsection A.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

9A Game and Game Laws, § 5.

§ 29.1-300.2.
Hunter education program.

The Department shall provide for a course of instruction in hunter safety, principles of conservation, and sportsmanship, and for this purpose may cooperate with any reputable association or organization having as one of its objectives the promotion of hunter safety, principles of conservation, and sportsmanship.

The Board shall establish at least one full-time hunter education coordinator position for each of the Department’s administrative regions. Each coordinator will be assigned to a conservation police officer district and have the responsibility for providing hunter education training throughout the administrative region.

The Department may designate as a hunter safety instructor any person found by it to be competent to give instruction in the courses required by this article. A person so appointed shall give such course of instruction, and, upon completion thereof, shall issue to the person instructed a certificate of competency as provided by the Board in hunter safety, principles of conservation, and sportsmanship.

The Board shall prescribe a minimum level of skill and knowledge to be required of all hunter safety instructors, and may limit the number of students per instructor in all required classes.

The Board may revoke the certificate of any instructor when, in the opinion of the Board, it is in the best interest of the Commonwealth to do so.

The Board shall promulgate rules and regulations in order to administer and enforce the provisions of §§

29.1-300.1

,

29.1-300.2

, and

29.1-300.3

.

History.

1987, c. 83, § 29-51.2; 2007, c. 87; 2012, c. 763.

Cross references.

As to hunter safety education programs for students in grades seven through 12, see § 22.1-204.2.

Editor’s note.

This section was enacted by Acts 1987, c. 83, as § 29-51.2. Pursuant to § 30-152, this section has been incorporated into Title 29.1 as §

29.1-300.2

.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 87 substituted “conservation police officer” for “game warden” in the last sentence of the second paragraph.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 763 substituted the current second paragraph for “The Board shall establish six full-time hunter education coordinator positions. Each coordinator will be assigned to a conservation police officer district and have the responsibility for providing hunter education training in that district” and in the last paragraph substituted “§§

29.1-300.1

,

29.1-300.2

, and

29.1-300.3

” for “§§

29.1-300.1

through

29.1-300.3

.”

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

9A Game and Game Laws, § 5.

§ 29.1-300.3.
Program fees.

No fee shall be charged for the instructor’s service; however, a fee to cover the cost of giving such instruction may be charged each person participating in and receiving such instruction. A record of such expenses shall be kept for inspection by the Department. The expenses may include, but not be limited to, such items as range fees, ammunition and transportation of students.

History.

1987, c. 83, § 29-51.3.

Editor’s note.

This section was enacted by Acts 1987, c. 83, as § 29-51.3. Pursuant to § 30-152, this section has been incorporated into Title 29.1 as §

29.1-300.3

.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

9A Game and Game Laws, § 5.

§ 29.1-300.4.
Apprentice hunting license; deferral of hunter education.

There is hereby established an apprentice hunting license. The license shall be a one-time nonrenewable license that shall be valid for two years from the date of purchase and shall entitle the licensee to a one-time deferral of completion of hunter education required under §

29.1-300.1

. The apprentice hunting licensee shall not hunt prior to completing hunter education unless accompanied and directly supervised by an adult over the age of 18 who has, on his person, a valid Virginia hunting license. For the purposes of this section, “accompanied and directly supervised” occurs when a person over 18 maintains a close visual and verbal contact with, provides adequate direction to, and can immediately assume control of the firearm from the apprentice hunter. The cost of the license shall be $10 for a resident and $20 for a nonresident. The Board may subsequently revise the cost of the license pursuant to §

29.1-103

.

Possession of a valid apprentice hunting license shall serve in lieu of the state resident hunting or nonresident hunting license required under subdivisions 2 and 3 of §

29.1-303

, respectively. The purchase of any other hunting licenses shall be at the same cost as specified for residents or nonresidents in this title or as subsequently revised by the Board pursuant to subdivision 16 of §

29.1-103

. The purchase of the apprentice hunting license shall not qualify the holder to purchase a regular hunting license or exempt the licensee from compliance with the requirements of this title and any regulations adopted by the Department. Any previous holder of a state resident or nonresident hunting license issued under this title shall be prohibited from the purchase of an apprentice hunting license for himself.

Upon completion of hunter education under §

29.1-300.1

, and unless otherwise required by law to be supervised, the apprentice hunting licensee may hunt unsupervised subject to the requirements of applicable state law and regulations.

The Board may adopt regulations to carry out the provisions of this section.

History.

2008, cc. 18, 416; 2009, c. 9; 2014, c. 244.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 9 added the last sentence in subsection A.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 244, in subsection A, inserted “prior to completing hunter education” in the third sentence; added subsection C and redesignated the remaining subsection accordingly.

§ 29.1-301.
Exemptions from license requirements.

No license shall be required of landowners, their spouses, their children and grandchildren and the spouses of such children and grandchildren, or the landowner’s parents, resident or nonresident, to hunt, trap and fish within the boundaries of their own lands and inland waters or while within such boundaries or upon any private permanent extension therefrom, to fish in any abutting public waters.

No license shall be required of any stockholder owning 50 percent or more of the stock of any domestic corporation owning land in this Commonwealth, his or her spouse and children and minor grandchildren, resident or nonresident, to hunt, trap and fish within the boundaries of lands and inland waters owned by the domestic corporation.

No license shall be required of bona fide tenants, renters or lessees to hunt, trap or fish within the boundaries of the lands or waters on which they reside or while within such boundaries or upon any private permanent extension therefrom, to fish in any abutting public waters if such individuals have the written consent of the landlord upon their person. A guest of the owner of a private fish pond shall not be required to have a fishing license to fish in such pond.

No license shall be required of resident or nonresident persons under 16 years of age to fish.

No license shall be required of a resident person 65 years of age or over to hunt or trap on private property in the county or city in which he resides. An annual license at a fee of $1 shall be required of a resident person 65 years of age or older to fish in any inland waters of the Commonwealth, which shall be in addition to a license to fish for trout as specified in subsection B of §

29.1-310

or a special lifetime trout fishing license as specified in §

29.1-302.4

. A resident 65 years of age or older may, upon proof of age satisfactory to the Department and the payment of a $1 fee, apply for and receive from any authorized agent of the Department a nontransferable annual license permitting such person to hunt or an annual license permitting such person to trap in all cities and counties of the Commonwealth. Any lifetime license issued pursuant to this article prior to July 1, 1988, shall remain valid for the lifetime of the person to whom it was issued. Any license issued pursuant to this section includes any damage stamp required pursuant to Article 3 (§

29.1-352

et seq.) of this chapter.

No license to fish shall be required of nonresident persons under 16 years of age when accompanied by a person possessing a valid license to fish in Virginia.

No license shall be required to trap rabbits with box traps.

No license shall be required of resident persons under 16 years of age to trap when accompanied by any person 18 years of age or older who possesses a valid state license to trap in this Commonwealth.

No license to hunt, trap or fish shall be required of any Indian who habitually resides on an Indian reservation or of a member of the Virginia recognized tribes who resides in the Commonwealth; however, such Indian must have on his person an identification card or paper signed by the chief of his tribe, a valid tribal identification card, written confirmation through a central tribal registry, or certification from a tribal office. Such card, paper, confirmation, or certification shall set forth that the person named is an actual resident upon such reservation or member of the recognized tribes in the Commonwealth, and such card, paper, confirmation or certification shall create a presumption of residence, which may be rebutted by proof of actual residence elsewhere.

No license to fish shall be required of legally blind persons.

No fishing license shall be required in any inland waters of the Commonwealth on free fishing days. The Board shall designate no more than three free fishing days in any calendar year. In the event that a free day is canceled as a result of an inclement weather event, the Board may designate another free fishing day in its place.

No license to fish, except for trout as provided in §

29.1-302.4

or subsection B of §

29.1-310

, in Laurel Lake and Beaver Pond at Breaks Interstate Park shall be required of a resident of the State of Kentucky who (i) possesses a valid license to fish in Kentucky or (ii) is exempt under Kentucky law from the requirement of possessing a valid fishing license.

No license to fish, except for trout as provided in subsection B of §

29.1-310

, shall be required of a member of the armed forces of the United States, on active duty, who is a resident of the Commonwealth while such person is on official leave, provided that person presents a copy of his leave papers upon request.

No license to hunt or fish shall be required of any person who is not hunting or fishing but is aiding a disabled person to hunt or fish when such disabled person possesses a valid Virginia hunting or fishing license under §

29.1-302

,

29.1-302.1

, or

29.1-302.2

.

D1.

No license shall be required of resident persons under 12 years of age to hunt, provided such person is accompanied and directly supervised by an adult who has, on his person, a valid Virginia hunting license as described in subsection B of §

29.1-300.1

.

History.

Code 1950, § 29-52; 1950, pp. 619, 627; 1954, c. 623; 1962, c. 526; 1964, c. 445; 1968, c. 673; 1974, c. 363; 1977, c. 392; 1980, cc. 494, 500; 1981, c. 16; 1985, c. 154; 1987, cc. 126, 488, 507; 1988, cc. 180, 488; 1992, c. 262; 1996, cc. 118, 151; 1997, c. 267; 2000, cc. 110, 142; 2001, cc. 49, 597; 2002, c. 67; 2004, c. 846; 2008, c. 279; 2010, c. 345; 2016, c. 63; 2018, cc. 116, 507.

Editor’s note.

Pursuant to § 30-152, effect has been given in this section, as set out above, to Acts 1987, cc. 126, 507, which amended former § 29-52, the comparable provision in former Title 29.

Acts 1987, c. 126, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not apply to persons who were issued a lifetime license for hunting and fishing by the Commission prior to July 1, 1987.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 110 and 142, effective March 17, 2000, are identical, and substituted “three” for “two” in the second sentence of subsection K.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 49, in subsection A, deleted “or” following “their spouses,” and inserted “or their parents” following “grandchildren.”

The 2001 amendment by c. 597, in subsection I, inserted “or of a member of the Virginia recognized tribes who resides in the Commonwealth,” substituted “tribe, a valid tribal identification card, written confirmation through a central tribal registry, or certification from a tribal office. Such card, paper, confirmation, or certification shall set” for “reservation setting,” and substituted “or member of the recognized tribes in the Commonwealth, and such card, paper, confirmation or certification” for “such card, or paper.”

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 67 inserted “or a special lifetime trout fishing license as specified in §

29.1-302.4

” at the end of the second sentence of subsection E; and inserted the reference to §

29.1-302.4

in subsections F and L.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 846, in subsection A, deleted “minor” following “their children and,” inserted “and the spouses of such children and grandchildren,” and substituted “the landowner’s” for “their”; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 279, in subsection M, inserted “or fish” following “to hunt” twice, inserted “or fishing” following “who is not hunting” and preceding “license under,” and deleted “or §” following “29.1-302” and inserted “or

29.1-302.2

” at the end.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 345 inserted subsection M and redesignated former subsection M as N.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 63 deleted “except those stocked with trout by the department or other public body” following “waters of the Commonwealth” in subsection K.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 116, effective March 2, 2018, added the third sentence in subsection K.

The 2018 amendment by c. 507, in subsection D, inserted “or nonresident”; substituted “of age” for “old” in subsections D and D1; and in subsection F, deleted “except for trout as provided in §

29.1-302.4

or subsection B of §

29.1-310

” following “No license to fish” and substituted “16 years” for “12 years.”

§ 29.1-302.
Special license for certain resident disabled veterans.

Certain resident veterans who are disabled due to a service-connected disability may apply for and receive from the Department a nontransferable license pursuant to 4VAC15-20-65, valid for life, permitting the veteran to hunt and freshwater fish, or to hunt only or to freshwater fish only, depending on which license is purchased, on any property in the Commonwealth according to restrictions and regulations of law. However, this license shall not entitle the owner to fish in designated waters stocked with trout by the Department or other public body.

The cost for a license under this section shall be:

For a resident veteran rated as totally and permanently disabled by the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs, no cost;

For a resident veteran rated 70 percent or more disabled, but less than totally and permanently disabled, by the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs, $50;

For a resident veteran rated 50 percent or more disabled, but less than 70 percent disabled, by the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs, $75; and

For a resident veteran rated 30 percent or more disabled, but less than 50 percent disabled, by the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs, $100.

History.

1976, c. 234, § 29-52.2; 1977, c. 167; 1985, c. 65; 1987, c. 488; 1996, c. 810; 2009, c. 9; 2012, cc. 321, 380; 2022, c. 40.

Cross references.

As to disabled hunter exemption from local tree stand ordinances, see §

29.1-528.2

.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 9 added the last sentence.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 321 and 380 are identical, and rewrote the section.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 40 designated the existing provisions as subsection A and added subsection B; in subsection A, substituted “Certain resident veterans who are” for “Any resident veteran who is totally and permanently,” deleted “as certified by the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs” following “service-connected disability,” and deleted “at no cost” following “and receive.”

§ 29.1-302.01.
Special fishing license for disabled active duty military personnel.

Any resident or nonresident who is (i) on active duty military service, (ii) disabled due to service-connected disability, and (iii) receiving inpatient or outpatient medical treatment from a hospital located in Virginia, an adjoining state, or the District of Columbia may apply for and shall receive from the Department a nontransferable state license to fish as required by subsections A and B of §

29.1-310

. This license shall be issued at no cost and shall be valid for one year from the date of issuance. The holder of the license shall not be eligible to receive a subsequent license issued under this section.

History.

2010, c. 822.

§ 29.1-302.02.
Special resident and nonresident hunting and fishing licenses for partially disabled veterans.

Any nonresident veteran who is rated by the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs as having at least a 70 percent service-connected disability, upon certification, shall pay an amount equal to one-half the fee for the state nonresident basic hunting license required by subdivision 3 of §

29.1-303

. The license fees established by this section may be revised by the Board pursuant to §

29.1-103

.

Any nonresident veteran who is rated by the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs as having at least a 70 percent service-connected disability, upon certification, shall pay an amount equal to one-half the fee for the state nonresident basic fishing license required by subdivision A 3 of §

29.1-310

. The license fees established by this section may be revised by the Board pursuant to §

29.1-103

.

History.

2011, c. 273; 2012, c. 244; 2022, c. 40.

Cross references.

As to disabled hunter exemption from local tree stand ordinances, see §

29.1-528.2

.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 244 designated the existing provisions of the section as subsection A; and added subsection B.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 40 substituted “nonresident” for “resident” throughout; substituted “subdivision 3” and “subdivision A 3” for “subdivision 2” and “subdivision A 2,” respectively, in subsections A and B; deleted the former second sentence in subsection A, which read: “Any nonresident veteran who is similarly rated, upon certification, shall pay an amount equal to one-half the fee for the state nonresident license required by subdivision 3 of {/n

29.1-303

”; and deleted the former second sentence in subsection B, which read: “Any nonresident veteran who is similarly rated, upon certification, shall pay an amount equal to one-half the fee for the state nonresident license required by subdivision A 3 of {/n

29.1-310

.”

§ 29.1-302.03.
Special licenses for certain nonresident disabled veterans.

Any nonresident veteran who is totally and permanently disabled due to a service-connected disability as certified by the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs shall pay an amount equal to one-quarter the fee for the state nonresident hunting license required by subdivision 3 of §

29.1-303

. The license fees established by this subsection may be revised by the Board pursuant to §

29.1-103

.

Any nonresident veteran who is totally and permanently disabled due to a service-connected disability as certified by the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs shall pay an amount equal to one-quarter the fee for the state nonresident fishing license required by subdivision A 3 of §

29.1-310

. However, this license shall not entitle such nonresident veteran to fish in designated waters stocked with trout by the Department or other public body. The license fees established by this subsection may be revised by the Board pursuant to §

29.1-103

.

History.

2014, c. 587.

Cross references.

As to disabled hunter exemption from local tree stand ordinances, see §

29.1-528.2

.

§ 29.1-302.1.
Special lifetime hunting and fishing licenses for residents and nonresidents.

Any resident or nonresident individual may apply for and receive from the Department, after payment of the appropriate fee, any of the following lifetime licenses which shall be valid for the life of the individual, nontransferable, and permit the person to engage in the licensed activity on any property in the Commonwealth according to restrictions and regulations of law:

A basic resident lifetime hunting license, to be obtained for a fee of $250. This license is valid for the lifetime of the license holder even if the license holder becomes a nonresident of the Commonwealth subsequent to the purchase of the license.

A basic resident lifetime fishing license, to be obtained for a fee of $250. This license is valid for the lifetime of the license holder even if the license holder becomes a nonresident of the Commonwealth subsequent to the purchase of the license.

A basic nonresident lifetime hunting license, to be obtained for a fee of $500.

A basic nonresident lifetime fishing license, to be obtained for a fee of $500.

A basic senior resident lifetime hunting license and bear, deer, and turkey license, to be obtained for a fee of $200. This license is available only to a resident of the Commonwealth who is 80 years of age or older and shall be valid for the lifetime of the license holder even if the license holder becomes a nonresident of the Commonwealth subsequent to the purchase of the license. This license shall include any special license necessary under §

29.1-305

for hunting bear, deer, and turkey.

A junior resident lifetime hunting license that is valid until an individual’s twelfth birthday, and which is transferable to a resident lifetime hunting license for no additional fee upon proof of completion of a hunter education course or equivalent, may be obtained for a fee of $250.

A junior nonresident lifetime hunting license that is valid until an individual’s twelfth birthday, and which is transferable to a nonresident lifetime hunting license for no additional fee upon proof of completion of a hunter education course or equivalent, may be obtained for a fee of $500.

An infant resident lifetime hunting license, to be obtained for a fee of $125. This license shall be issued only to an individual who is younger than two years of age and shall be valid to be used as prescribed under subsection D1 of §

29.1-301

until an individual’s twelfth birthday. Upon proof of completion of a hunter education course or equivalent, this license shall be transferable to a resident lifetime hunting license for no additional fee. This license shall remain valid even if the license holder becomes a nonresident of the Commonwealth subsequent to the purchase of the license.

An infant nonresident lifetime hunting license, to be obtained for a fee of $250. This license shall be issued only to an individual who is younger than two years of age and shall be valid to be used as prescribed under subsection D1 of §

29.1-301

until an individual’s twelfth birthday. Upon proof of completion of a hunter education course or equivalent, this license shall be transferable to a nonresident lifetime hunting license for no additional fee. This license shall remain valid even if the license holder becomes a resident of the Commonwealth subsequent to the purchase of the license.

An infant resident lifetime fishing license, to be obtained for a fee of $125. This license shall be issued only to an individual who is younger than two years of age. This license is valid for the lifetime of the license holder even if the license holder becomes a nonresident of the Commonwealth subsequent to the purchase of the license.

An infant nonresident lifetime fishing license, to be obtained for a fee of $250. This license shall be issued only to an individual who is younger than two years of age. This license is valid for the lifetime of the license holder even if the license holder becomes a resident of the Commonwealth subsequent to the purchase of the license.Such basic lifetime hunting licenses shall serve in lieu of the state resident hunting license as provided for in subdivision 2 of §

29.1-303

, or state nonresident hunting license as provided for in subdivision 3 of §

29.1-303

. Such basic lifetime fishing licenses shall serve in lieu of the state resident fishing license as provided for in subdivision A 2 of §

29.1-310

or state nonresident fishing license as provided for in subdivision A 3 of §

29.1-310

.

Applications for all lifetime hunting and fishing licenses authorized by this section shall be made to the Department. The form and issuance of such a license shall conform to the provisions of this chapter for all licenses.Except as otherwise specifically provided by law, all money credited to, held by, or to be received by the Department from the sale of licenses authorized by this section shall be consolidated and placed in the Lifetime Hunting and Fishing Endowment Fund established in §

29.1-101.1

.

Any resident who is permanently disabled, as defined in §

58.1-3217

, who applies for either of the resident lifetime licenses authorized by this section shall receive such a license for a fee of $5. The applicant shall provide proof of permanent disability acceptable to the Director of the Department.

Any resident 45 years of age or older who applies for either of the resident lifetime licenses authorized by subdivision A 1 or A 2 shall receive such a license for one of the following fees based on age: age 45 through 50, $200; age 51 through 55, $150; age 56 through 60, $100; age 61 through 64, $50; and age 65 or older, $10.

The Board may subsequently revise the cost of licenses set forth in this section pursuant to §

29.1-103

.

History.

1987, c. 95, § 29-52.3; 1988, c. 181; 1989, c. 427; 1996, cc. 7, 109, 810; 1997, c. 247; 2009, c. 9; 2010, c. 251; 2020, cc. 564, 958.

Cross references.

As to disabled hunter exemption from local tree stand ordinances, see §

29.1-528.2

.

Editor’s note.

This section was enacted by Acts 1987, c. 95, as § 29-52.3. Pursuant to § 30-152, this section has been incorporated into Title 29.1 as §

29.1-302.1

.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 9 added subsection E.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 251 added subdivisions A 7 through A 9 and made minor stylistic changes to subsections C and D.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 564 inserted subdivision A 5, redesignated former subdivisions A 5 through A 10 as subdivisions A 6 through A 11, and substituted “subdivision A 1 or A 2” for “this section” in subsection D.

The 2020 amendment by c. 958 deleted “of Game and Inland Fisheries” in subsection C at the end of the second sentence.

§ 29.1-302.2.
Special lifetime fishing license; permanently disabled persons.

Any resident who is permanently disabled, as defined in §

58.1-3217

, who applies for a special lifetime state resident fishing license shall receive such a license for a fee of five dollars or as subsequently revised by the Board pursuant to §

29.1-103

. The applicant shall provide proof of permanent disability acceptable to the Director of the Department.

History.

1989, c. 91; 2009, c. 9; 2020, c. 958.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 9 added “or as subsequently revised by the Board pursuant to §

29.1-103

” at the end of the first sentence.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 958 deleted “of Game and Inland Fisheries” at the end of the second sentence.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

8B M.J. Fish and Fisheries, § 5.

§ 29.1-302.3.
Special guest fishing licenses.

An owner or bona fide lessee of private land bordering inland waters lying adjacent to North Carolina land or water may apply for a special guest fishing license entitling the licensee and his guests to fish from the property and any private dock, pier or other permanent extension into public waters without an additional fishing license except as required in designated waters stocked with trout and in waters where a daily fishing fee has been imposed pursuant to §

29.1-318

. The annual fee of a special guest fishing license shall be $50 or as subsequently revised by the Board pursuant to §

29.1-103

. A special guest fishing license shall not be valid for any property, pier or dock operated for any commercial purpose. A special guest fishing license shall not be in force unless displayed on the premises of the property. A special guest fishing license shall not be transferable.

History.

1992, c. 198; 2009, c. 9.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 9 substituted “$50 or as subsequently revised by the Board pursuant to §

29.1-103

” for “fifty dollars” at the end in the second sentence.

§ 29.1-302.4.
Special lifetime trout fishing licenses for residents and nonresidents.

Any resident or nonresident individual may apply for and receive from the Department, after payment of the appropriate fee, any of the following lifetime licenses, which shall be valid for the life of the individual, nontransferable, and shall permit the person to engage in the licensed activity on any property in the Commonwealth according to restrictions and regulations of law:

A special resident lifetime trout fishing license, to be obtained for a fee of $250. This license is valid for the lifetime of the license holder even if the license holder becomes a nonresident of the Commonwealth subsequent to the purchase of the license.

A special nonresident lifetime trout fishing license, to be obtained for a fee of $500. Such special lifetime trout fishing licenses shall apply only to specially stocked trout waters as may be designated by the Board, and shall serve in lieu of the state resident trout fishing license as provided for in subdivision B 1 of §

29.1-310

or state nonresident trout fishing license as provided for in subdivision B 2 of §

29.1-310

. Such special lifetime trout fishing licenses shall serve in addition to fishing license fees as provided for in subdivision A of §

29.1-310

or special lifetime fishing license as provided for in §

29.1-302.1

.

Applications for all lifetime trout fishing licenses authorized by this section shall be made to the Department. The form and issuance of such a license shall conform to the provisions of this chapter for all licenses.Except as otherwise specifically provided by law, all money credited to, held by, or to be received by the Department from the sale of licenses authorized by this section shall be consolidated and placed in the Lifetime Hunting and Fishing Endowment Fund established in §

29.1-101.1

.

Any resident forty-five years of age or older who applies for the resident lifetime trout licenses authorized by this section shall receive such a license for one of the following fees based on age: age forty-five through fifty, $200; age fifty-one through fifty-five, $150; age fifty-six through sixty, $100; age sixty-one through sixty-four, fifty dollars; and age sixty-five or older, ten dollars.

The Board may subsequently revise the cost of licenses set forth in this section pursuant to §

29.1-103

.

History.

2002, c. 67; 2009, c. 9.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 9 added subsection D.

§ 29.1-303.
Fees to hunt.

The license fees to hunt shall be as follows or as such fees may be subsequently revised by the Board pursuant to §

29.1-103

:

County or city resident license to hunt in the county or city of residence only, $5.

State resident license to hunt in all counties and cities of the Commonwealth, issued to residents age 16 or older, $12.

State nonresident license for persons 16 years of age and older to hunt in all counties and cities of the Commonwealth, $80; however, for (i) nonresidents under the age of 12, $12, and (ii) nonresidents 12 years of age to 15 years of age, $15.

History.

Code 1950, § 29-54; 1960, c. 566; 1974, c. 363; 1980, c. 494; 1987, c. 488; 1988, c. 250; 2003, c. 120; 2004, c. 269; 2009, c. 9.

Cross references.

As to purchase of sportsman’s hunting and fishing license in lieu of license provided for in subdivision 2 of this section, see §

29.1-310.1

.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 120 substituted “$5” for “five dollars” in subdivision 1; in subdivision 2, substituted “16” for “sixteen,” and “$12” for “twelve dollars;” and substituted “$80” for “sixty dollars” in subdivision 3.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 269 rewrote subdivision 3, which formerly read: “State nonresident license to hunt in all counties and cities of the Commonwealth, $80.”

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 9 added “or as such fees may be subsequently revised by the Board pursuant to §

29.1-103

” at the end of the introductory language.

§ 29.1-303.1.
Trip hunting licenses.

Nonresidents or residents of the Commonwealth may purchase a trip hunting license in lieu of the hunting license required by §

29.1-303

. The duration for which the license shall be valid shall be established by the Board. The fee for the trip hunting license shall be established by the Board and may be revised pursuant to §

29.1-103

.

History.

1988, c. 250; 2003, c. 120; 2009, c. 9; 2013, c. 351; 2019, c. 147.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 120 substituted “$40” for “thirty dollars.”

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 9 inserted “or as subsequently revised by the Board pursuant to §

29.1-103

” in the last sentence.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 351 substituted “nonresident trip” for “three-day” in the first sentence, added the second sentence, and rewrote the last sentence, which read: “The fee for the three-day nonresident hunting license shall be $40 or as subsequently revised by the Board pursuant to §

29.1-103

, and the license shall be effective for three successive days as specified on the face of the license.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 147 inserted “or residents,” deleted “nonresident” before “trip hunting license” twice and once before “hunting license” and deleted “subdivision 3 of” following “required by.”

§ 29.1-303.2.
State junior resident hunting license fee.

The fee for a license to hunt in all counties and cities of the Commonwealth, issued to a state resident under the age of sixteen, shall be seven dollars and fifty cents or as subsequently revised by the Board pursuant to §

29.1-103

.

History.

1988, c. 250; 2009, c. 9.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 9 added “or as subsequently revised by the Board pursuant to §

29.1-103

” at the end.

§ 29.1-303.2:1.
State junior resident bear hunting license; fee.

The Board may create a separate state youth resident license for hunting bear that may be obtained by any resident under the age of 16. The fee for the state youth resident license for hunting bear shall be $5.50. The license fees established by this section may be revised by the Board pursuant to §

29.1-103

.

The state youth resident license to hunt bear may be obtained from the clerk or agent of any county or city whose duty it is to sell licenses.

History.

2017, c. 353.